src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UU_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kʼajúu - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UU_STEM_2

     kʼajúu+V+Interr+Past: kʼajáawaa
     kʼajúu+V+Indir+Past: kʼajáawaan
     kʼajúu+V+Rel+Evid: kʼajáawaas
     kʼajúu+V+NonFact: kʼajáawang
     kʼajúu+V+Past+NonFact: kʼajáawaa.ang
     kʼajúu+V+Interr+Near+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaʼáa
     kʼajúu+V+Near+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaʼáang
     kʼajúu+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaasdláa
     kʼajúu+V+VNear+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaasdláang
     kʼajúu+V+Cert+Rel: kʼajáawʼahlans
     kʼajúu+V+Ints+Past: kʼajáawaaʼahlang
     kʼajúu+V+Cont: kʼajáawaaʼahlanggaa
     kʼajúu+V+Ctfact+Pres: kʼajáawaaʼahlanggang
     kʼajúu+V+Rflx: kʼajáawʼahl
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaaʼáng
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Near+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaaʼánggang
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     kʼajúu+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: kʼajáawang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
